District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
42 act may be cited as the “Personal Health Data Security Amendment Act of 2025”.
1

43 Sec. 2. Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
44 follows:
45 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new subchapter designation to read as
46 follows:
47 “Subchapter V. Personal Health Data Security.
48 “28-3881. Definitions.
49 “28-3882. Personal health data security protections.”.
50 (b) A new subchapter V is added to read as follows:
51 “Subchapter V. Personal Health Data Security.
52 “§ 28-3881. Definitions.
53 “For purposes of this subchapter, the term:
54 “(1) “Affiliate” means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under
55 common control with another entity.
56 “(2) “Control” means ownership or the power to exercise a controlling influence
57 over the management or policies of an entity.
58 “(3) “Controller” means a person, organization, entity, or affiliate that determines
59 the purposes and means of processing personal health data, which includes how and why
60 personal health data is collected, shared, disclosed, used, and stored.
61 “(4) “Data subject” means an individual who is identified or identifiable, directly
62 or indirectly, through their personal health data, including byname, identification number, online
63 identifier, location data, or other factors specific to the individual’s physical or mental health,
64 reproductive or gender-affirming care status, or biometric information.
2

65 “(5) “Deidentified data” means information that cannot reasonably be used to
66 infer information about, or otherwise be linked to a particular individual, household, or device.
67 “(6) “Geofence” means technology that uses global positioning coordinates, cell
68 tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency identification, Wi-fi data, or any other form of
69 spatial or location detection to establish a virtual boundary or to locate an individual within a
70 virtual boundary 2,000 feet or less from the perimeter of a specific physical location.
71 “(7) “Personal health data” means any information that is reasonably linkable to
72 an individual in connection with the physical or mental health of that individual, including:
73 “(A) Medical records, histories, or diagnoses;
74 “(B) Genetic information, biometric data, or other physiological
75 indicators;
76 “(C) Prescription and medication information;
77 “(D) Laboratory test results;
78 “(E) Health insurance, billing, or payment records related to health care or
79 services; and
80 “(F) Any information collected by a health care provider, health plan, or
81 legal entity regarding the individual’s health status, care, or related payments.
82 “(8) “Process” means an operation or set of operations performed on personal
83 health data, including the collection, use, access, sharing, sale, monetization, analysis, retention,
84 creation, generation, derivation, recording, organization, structuring, storage, disclosure,
85 transmission, disposal, licensing, destruction, deletion, or modification of personal health data.
3

86 “(9) “Processor” means any person, organization, entity, or affiliate that processes
87 personal health data on behalf of a controller but does not independently determine the purposes
88 or means of processing.
89 “(10) “Sell” means to transfer personal health data to a third party for monetary
90 value or other forms of consideration. The term “sell” does not include the transferring of
91 personal health data to a third party as part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other
92 transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets.
93 “(11) “Sub-processor” means a person or entity engaged by a data processor to
94 process personal data on behalf of a data controller.
95 “(12) “Third party” means a person or entity, other than the individual who is the
96 subject of the personal health data, a controller, or a processor, that receives, obtains, or
97 otherwise accesses personal health data for the third party’s own independent purposes.”.
98 “§ 28-3882. Personal health data protection procedures.
99 “(a) No person or entity may implement a geofence around a location that
100 provides in-person health care services where the geofence is used to:
101 “(1) Identify or track individuals seeking health care services;
102 “(2) Collect personal health data; or
103 “(3) Send notifications, messages, or advertisements to individuals related
104 to their personal health data or health care services.
105 “(b) A controller that enters into an agreement with a processor to process personal health
106 data on behalf of the controller shall:
107 “(1) Maintain a health data privacy policy thar clear and conspicuously discloses:
108 “(A) The categories of personal health data collected;
4

109 “(B) The purposes for which the personal health data is collected,
110 including how the data will be used;
111 “(C) The categories of sources from which the personal health data is
112 collected;
113 “(D) The categories of personal health data that are shared;
114 “(E) A list of the categories of third parties and the specific affiliates with
115 whom the controller shares the personal health data, whether actively or passively, and the
116 purposes for such sharing;
117 “(F) The length of time the controller intends to retain each category of
118 personal health data, or if that is not possible, the criteria used to determine that period; and
119 “(G) How an individual can exercise the rights provided in subsection (d)
120 of this section; and
121 “(2) Limit access to personal health data to individuals or entities who need it to:
122 “(A) carry out the purposes for which the data subject gave consent; or
123 “(B) provide a product or service requested by the data subject.
124 “(c) A controller may not:
125 “(1) Sell or offer to sell personal health data without the data subject’s affirmative
126 consent;
127 “(2) Collect or disclose personal health data for a purpose not reasonably
128 necessary to provide a product or service requested by the data subject without obtaining
129 consent;
130 “(3) Retaliate against or deny services to a data subject for exercising rights
131 provided under this section;
5

132 “(4) Fail to delete personal health data upon verified request from the data
133 subject;
134 “(5) Contract with a processor to process personal health data in a manner
135 inconsistent with the controller’s privacy policy; or
136 “(6) Disclose personal health data to a third party unless the disclosure is
137 consistent with the controller’s published policy and the data subject’s consent.
138 “(d) Data subjects may exercise the right to:
139 “(1) Confirm whether a controller is processing personal health data in relation to
140 the data subject;
141 “(2) Withdraw consent that was once given to a controller to process personal
142 health data at any time for whatever reason; and
143 “(3) Request to delete personal health data that is associated with the data subject
144 within the database of the controller and any other legal entity whom the controller disclosed the
145 personal health data to, except to the extent necessary to comply with the controller’s legal
146 obligations.
147 “(e) Each controller shall establish, maintain, and make publicly available a secure and
148 accessible process by which a data subject may request the deletion of their personal health data.
149 The deletion process shall:
150 “(1) Allow a data subject to submit a request electronically and, where applicable,
151 through the interface the data subject regularly uses to access the controller’s product or service;
152 “(2) Include commercially reasonable methods for authenticating the identity of
153 the requesting data subject;
6

154 “(3) Provide a mechanism for a data subject to track the status of their deletion
155 request; and
156 “(4) Establish internal procedures for promptly transmitting verified deletion
157 requests to all processors and third parties with whom the controller has shared the data.
158 “(f) Upon receiving a valid request for data deletion from a data subject, the controller
159 shall:
160 “(1) Delete the personal health data of the data subject from all systems within its
161 possession or control, including active databases, archived storage, and backup systems within
162 183 days, unless retention is required by District or federal law; and
163 “(2) Notify all processors, affiliates, and third parties to whom the controller has
164 disclosed the personal health data of the data subject’s deletion request and direct each to delete
165 such data in accordance with this subchapter within the preceding 24 months, unless retention is
166 required by District or federal law; or
167 “(3) Where deletion within 183 days is not feasible, the controller shall, within
168 that period, submit a written explanation to the Office of the Attorney General identifying the
169 reason for the delay, the data retained, and any other relevant information.
170 “(g)(1) Each processor who is notified by a controller of a deletion request pursuant to
171 subsection (f) of this section shall, in turn, notify all sub-processors engaged in processing the
172 data of the deletion request and ensure deletion is completed and confirmed in writing to the
173 controller.
174 “(2) Processors and third parties shall complete deletion within 120 days of
175 receiving the controller’s direction and shall confirm deletion in writing to the controller.
7

176 “(h)(1) A controller shall respond to a verified deletion request within 183 days of receipt
177 of the request.
178 “(2) The controller may extend the response period once for an additional 60 days
179 when reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of requests. Any
180 such extension shall be communicated to the data subject within the initial 183-day period,
181 including the reasons for the delay.
182 “(3) A controller shall provide information in response to a deletion request at
183 least twice during any 12-month period.
184 “(h)(1) The controller shall take reasonable steps to authenticate the request for data
185 deletion promptly and shall not use authentication procedures to delay compliance with this
186 section.
187 “(2) If a controller is unable to authenticate a data subject’s request for data
188 deletion using commercially reasonable efforts, the controller shall not required to comply with
189 the request and may request that the data subject provide additional information reasonably
190 necessary to authenticate the individual and the request.
191 “(3) In the event that a controller determines that a data subject’s requests for
192 deletion are excessive or repetitive, the controller may:
193 “(A) Charge a reasonable fee to cover administrative costs; or
194 “(B) Decline to act on the request; provided, that the controller bears the
195 burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive nature of the request.
196 “(4) Controllers shall maintain written documentation of all deletion requests, actions
197 taken, and confirmations received for at least two years for inspection by the Office of the
198 Attorney General.
8

199 “(i)(1) The Office of the Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce the
200 provisions of this subchapter.
201 “(2) The Attorney General may investigate alleged violations of this act, issue
202 subpoenas, compel the production of documents or testimony, and bring a civil action in the
203 Superior Court of the District of Columbia to:
204 “(A) Enjoin further violations of this subchapter;
205 “(B) Obtain restitution or other appropriate relief for individuals whose
206 personal health data was processed in violation of this subchapter; and
207 “(C) Seek civil penalties of not more than $10,000 for each violation, or
208 such other amount as the court deems just and reasonable.
209 “(m) The Office of the Attorney General, pursuant to § 2-501 et seq., shall issue rules to
210 implement the provisions of this subchapter.
211 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
212 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
213 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
214 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
215 Sec. 4. Effective date.
216 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
217 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
218 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
219 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
9